Utah statutes.
39-6-77.   Contempt toward officials.

A person subject to this chapter who uses contemptuous words against the president of the United States, the governor, or the Legislature, or the governor or legislature of any state, territory, commonwealth, or possession where that person is serving, shall be punished as a military court directs.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

